Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1243.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 4(g.1), 301.7(a), 301.8(b)(1), 401(e)1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829 (1), 402(a), 404(c), (d)(1) and (1.1) and (e)(2)(iv), (v) and (vi) and 501(c)(1) of the act of December 5, 1936 (2nd Sp.Sess., 1937 P.L.2897, No.1), known as the Unemployment Compensation Law, are amended to read:Section 4. Definitions.--The following words and phrases, as used in this act, shall have the following meanings, unless the context clearly requires otherwise.* * *[(g.1) "Credit week" means any calendar week in an individual's base year with respect to which he was paid in employment as defined in this act, remuneration of not less than:(1) One hundred dollars ($100). This paragraph shall expire December 31, 2014.(2) Sixteen (16) times the minimum hourly wage required by the act of January 17, 1968 (P.L.11, No.5), known as "The Minimum Wage Act of 1968." This paragraph shall take effect January 1, 2015.Only one credit week can be established with respect to any one calendar week.]* * *Section 301.7. Trigger Determination.--(a) On July 1 of every year, the secretary shall calculate the trigger percentage to be used in setting surcharge and contribution rates for the contributions required under sections 301.2, 301.4 and 301.5 and in setting the benefit reduction required under section 404(e)(4) for the following calendar year. The secretary shall[:(1) add the principal amount of outstanding bonds under Article XIV and the amount of outstanding advances under Title XII of the Social Security Act (58 Stat. 790, 42 U.S.C. § 1321 20250HB1243PN1392 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 et seq.) and subtract that sum from the balance in the Unemployment Compensation Fund;(2) determine the average of the benefit costs for the three immediately preceding fiscal years; and(3) calculate the percentage that the amount determined under paragraph (1) represents of the average of the benefit costs.] determine the average high cost multiple for the preceding calendar year in accordance with 20 CFR 606.3 (relating to definitions). The trigger percentage shall be the percentage determined by the ratio of the average high cost multiple over one.* * *Section 301.8. Trigger Rate Redeterminations.--* * *(b) (1) For calendar years 2013 through the year determined under paragraph (4), if the trigger percentage as of July 1 of the preceding calendar year is less than [two hundred fifty per centum (250%)] one hundred per centum (100%), the rates determined under paragraph (2) shall apply. For calendar years following the year determined under paragraph (4), if the trigger percentage as of July 1 of the preceding calendar year is less than [two hundred fifty per centum (250%)] one hundred per centum (100%), the rates determined under paragraph (3) shall apply.* * *Section 401. Qualifications Required to Secure Compensation.--Compensation shall be payable to any employe who is or becomes unemployed, and who--* * *(e) (1) [Has been unemployed for a waiting period of one week.] (Reserved).20250HB1243PN1392 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *Section 402. Ineligibility for Compensation.--An employe shall be ineligible for compensation for any week--(a) In which his unemployment is due to failure, without good cause, either to apply for suitable work at such time and in such manner as the department may prescribe, or to accept suitable work when offered to him by the employment office or by any employer, irrespective of whether or not such work is in "employment" as defined in this act: Provided, That such employer notifies the employment office of such offer within seven (7) days after the making thereof; however this subsection shall not cause a disqualification of [a waiting week or] benefits under the following circumstances: when work is offered by his employer and he is not required to accept the offer pursuant to the terms of the labor-management contract or agreement, or pursuant to an established employer plan, program or policy: Provided further, That a claimant shall not be disqualified for refusing suitable work when he is in training approved under section 236(a)(1) of the Trade Act of 1974.* * *Section 404. Rate and Amount of Compensation.--Compensation shall be paid to each eligible employe in accordance with the following provisions of this section except that compensation payable with respect to weeks ending in benefit years which begin prior to the first day of January 1989 shall be paid on the basis of the provisions of this section in effect at the beginning of such benefit years.* * *(c) If an otherwise eligible employe has base year wages in an amount equal to or in excess of the amount of qualifying 20250HB1243PN1392 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 wages appearing in Part C of the Table Specified for the Determination of Rate and Amount of Benefits on the line on which in Part B there appears his weekly benefit rate, as determined under subsection (a) of this section, [and had eighteen (18) or more credit weeks during his base year,] he shall be entitled during his benefit year to the amount appearing in Part B on said line multiplied by the number of [credit weeks during his base year] weeks for which a claim for unemployment benefits is filed, up to a maximum of twenty-six (26). Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, any employe [with less than eighteen (18) credit weeks] without wages in at least two (2) quarters during the employe's base year shall be ineligible to receive any amount of compensation.(d) (1) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section each eligible employe who is unemployed with respect to any week ending subsequent to July 1, 1980 shall be paid, with respect to such week, compensation in an amount equal to his weekly benefit rate less the total of (i) the remuneration, if any, paid or payable to him with respect to such week for services performed which is in excess of his partial benefit credit[,] and (ii) vacation pay, if any, which is in excess of his partial benefit credit, except when paid to an employe who is permanently or indefinitely separated from his employment. [and (iii) the amount of severance pay that is attributed to the week.(1.1) For purposes of clause (1)(iii), all of the following apply:(i) "Severance pay" means one or more payments made by an employer to an employe on account of separation from the service of the employer, regardless of whether the employer is legally 20250HB1243PN1392 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 bound by contract, statute or otherwise to make such payments. The term does not include payments for pension, retirement or accrued leave or payments of supplemental unemployment benefits.(ii) The amount of severance pay attributed pursuant to subclause (iii) shall be an amount not less than zero (0) determined by subtracting forty per centum (40%) of the average annual wage as calculated under subsection (e) as of June 30 immediately preceding the calendar year in which the claimant's benefit year begins from the total amount of severance pay paid or payable to the claimant by the employer.(iii) Severance pay is attributed as follows:(A) Severance pay is attributed to the day, days, week or weeks immediately following the employe's separation.(B) The number of days or weeks to which severance pay is attributed is determined by dividing the total amount of severance pay by the regular full-time daily or weekly wage of the claimant.(C) The amount of severance pay attributed to each day or week equals the regular full-time daily or weekly wage of the claimant.(D) When the attribution of severance pay is made on the basis of the number of days, the pay shall be attributed to the customary working days in the calendar week.]* * *(e) * * *(2) * * *(iv) In addition to the limitations set forth in subclause (iii), the following shall apply:(A) Notwithstanding the provisions of subclause (iii)(B), for calendar years 2020 through 2023, the maximum weekly benefit 20250HB1243PN1392 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 rate shall not increase if the trigger percentage determined under section 301.7(a) is less than one hundred ten per centum (110%) as of July 1, 2019.(B) Notwithstanding the provisions of subclause (iii)(B.1), for calendar year 2024, the maximum weekly benefit rate may not increase from the preceding year if the trigger percentage determined under section 301.7(a) is less than [two hundred fifteen per centum (215%)] eighty-six per centum (86%) as of July 1, 2023.(C) If the maximum weekly benefit rate does not increase under subparagraph (B), it may not increase until the year following a July 1 determination under section 301.7(a) that the trigger percentage is at least [two hundred fifty per centum (250%)] one hundred per centum (100%).(D) If the conditions of subparagraph (C) are met, for the purpose of determining the maximum weekly benefit, subclause (iii) shall apply.(v) If, on July 1, 2025, the trigger percentage determined under section 301.7(a) is less than [two hundred fifty per centum (250%)] one hundred per centum (100%), the following shall apply:(A) Notwithstanding the definition of "highest quarterly wages" in subsection (b), but subject to subclause (vi), "highest quarterly wages" for purposes of this section for calendar years 2026 and thereafter shall be the average of the total wages (computed to the nearest dollar), which were paid to the employe computed as follows:(I) The wages paid to the employe in that calendar quarter in which such total wages were highest during the base year shall be calculated.20250HB1243PN1392 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (II) The amount calculated under division (I) shall be added to an amount equal to one hundred thirty per centum (130%) of the wages paid to the employe in the calendar quarter in which such total wages were the second highest of any calendar quarter during the base year, provided that the amount added under this division (II) may not be greater than the wages paid to the employe during the highest calendar quarter under division (I).(III) The sum calculated under division (II) shall be divided by two.(B) Notwithstanding section 401(a)(2), and except as provided in subsections (a)(3) and (e)(1) and (2), section 401(a) shall require that the second entry in Part A of the table for the determination of rate and amount of benefits, on the line on which there appears the employe's weekly benefit rate, does not exceed sixty-three per centum (63%) of the employe's total base year wages.(vi) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (b) and subclause (v) if, on July 1, 2026, or July 1 of any subsequent year, the trigger percentage determined under section 301.7(a) is at least [two hundred fifty per centum (250%)] one hundred per centum (100%), the following shall apply:(A) "Highest quarterly wages" for the subsequent calendar year and thereafter shall be determined as provided in subsection (b) and not as provided in subclause (v).(B) Section 401(a)(2) shall apply and not subclause (v)(B).* * *Section 501. Determination of Compensation Appeals.--* * *(c) (1) The department shall promptly examine each claim for [waiting week credit and each claim for] compensation and on the basis of the facts found by it shall determine whether or 20250HB1243PN1392 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 not the claim is valid.* * *Section 2. The definition of "employee information" in sections 1501 and 1501-A of the act are amended to read:Section 1501. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Employee information." The name and Social Security number of each employee[,] and the amount of wages paid to each employee [and the number of credit weeks for each employee] in each calendar quarter.* * *Section 1501-A. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Employee information." The name and Social Security number of each employee[,] and the amount of wages paid to each employee [and the number of credit weeks for each employee] in each calendar quarter.* * *Section 3. The Secretary of Labor and Industry shall transmit a notice to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin upon completion of implementation of the technological upgrades to the delivery system for unemployment compensation benefits.20250HB1243PN1392 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 4. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) The amendment of sections 301.7(a), 301.8(b)(1) and 404(e)(2)(iv), (v) and (vi) of the act shall take effect July 1, 2025.(2) The following shall take effect immediately:Section 3 of this act.This section.(3) The remainder of this act shall take effect upon publication of the notice under section 3 of this act.20250HB1243PN1392 - 10 - 123456789